enhuige.foma
define HarmRuleIgetattet1mely §igetattet1mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* z "^"  _   ,,
                     §igetattet1mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* z "^"  _    ,,
                     §igetattet1mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel* "^" ?*   _    ; 
define HarmRuleIgetattet2mely §igetattet2mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet2mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* t "^" _    ,,
                     §igetattet2mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* [ s | z | g  | m ] "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet2mely§ ->  o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ s | z | g  | m ] "^" _    ,,
                     §igetattet2mely§ -> t o t // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* \t "^" _   ,,
                     §igetattet2mely§ -> t o t // .#. \"^"* BackVowel  \Vowel*  "^" ?* \t "^" _    ,,  
                     §igetattet2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel  \Vowel* "^" ?* \t "^" _   .o. 
                     §igetattet2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel  Consnoszgm* "^"   _    ; 
define HarmRuleelolmely §igeelolmely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                  §igeelolmely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleszelolmely §szelolmely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ s | z ] "^"  _ ,,
                  §szelolmely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* [ s | z ] "^" _ ,,
                  §szelolmely§ -> s z // .#. \"^"* "^" [ \"^"* "^"]* _ ;
define HarmRuleszelol2mely §szelol2mely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* [ s | z ] "^"  _ ,,
                  §szelol2mely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* [ s | z ] "^" _ ;
define HarmRuleaemely §aemely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §aemely§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleeomely §eomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ ,,
                  §eomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteomely §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ é | í ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteomely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteomely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                §felteomely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* \Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo1mely §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ e | é | i | í ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo1mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ö | ő | ü | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat1+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo1mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulefelteo2mely §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ á | ó | ú ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^"  ?* _ ,,
                  §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ é ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §felteo2mely§ -> o // .#. \"^"* [ ő | ű ] \Vowel* Consgat+  "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §felteo2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* Consgat+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                §felteo2mely§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* \Consgat* "^" ?* _ ;


define HarmRulej §j§-> %$ // .#. \"^"* s z "^" _ .o.
                 §j§-> %$ // .#. \"^"* z s "^" _ .o.
                 §j§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* z z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* s s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> z // .#. \"^"* \s z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> s // .#. \"^"* \z s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> j // .#. \"^"* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] "^" _ .o.
                 §j§ -> z // .#. ?* \s z "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> s // .#. ?* \z s "^"  _ .o.
                 §j§ -> j // .#. ?* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] "^" _ .o.
                 z -> s  || s _ %^ %$ .o.
                 %$ -> z  || s s %^ _ .o.
                 s -> z  || z _ %^ %$ .o.
                 %$ -> s  || z z %^ _ ;

define HarmRuleg §g§-> 0 // .#. \"^"* [ g g ] "^" _ .o.
                 §g§-> g //  ?*  _ ;

define HarmRuleszorelol §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> s z //  Vowel %^* [ n y | g y | t y | d d  ] %^ _ .o.
                        §szorelol§ -> a s z //  BackVowel %^* Cons+ %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> e s z //  FrontVowel %^* Cons+ %^* Consnosz %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> e l //  .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^  _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> ö l // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelol§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* Conssz+ %^ _ ;
#define HarmRuleszorelolmely §szorelolmely§ -> s z // .#. ?* %^ _ ;

define HarmRuleszorelolmely §szorelolmely§ -> s z // .#. ?* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelolmely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* Conssz+ %^ _ ;
define Constnelkul1 [ b | d | f | g | k | p | v ];
define Constnelkul2 [ b | d | f | g | k | p | v | l l ];
define HarmRuletatt §tatt§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul1 ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul1 ] %^ _ ;
define HarmRuletatt1 §tatt1§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt1§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul ] %^ _ ;
define HarmRuletatt2 §tatt2§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul2 ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt2§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul2 ] %^ _ ;
define Suffixl   §l§ -> 0 // l l [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §l§ -> l // \[ l l ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;

 

define ToUpCase [a:A|á:Á|b:B|c:C|d:D|e:E|é:É|f:F|g:G|h:H|i:I|í:Í|j:J|k:K|l:L|m:M|n:N|o:O|ó:Ó|ö:Ö|ő:Ő|p:P|q:Q|r:R|s:S|t:T|u:U|ú:Ú|ü:Ü|ű:Ű|v:V|w:W|x:X|y:Y|z:Z] ?* | ?* ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup      "^"        -> 0;
define CleanupEndings  "^" "+" {cRep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cImp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf11}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf13}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf21}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf22}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf23}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cInf}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAdv}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccAdvan}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNrep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPot}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl3}  -> 0 ;
                      
echo ">>> read in enhuige <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar  Filter1               .o. 
                Lexicon               .o.                
                CleanupEndings        .o.
                Suffixl               .o.
                HarmRuleAAA           .o. 
                HarmRuleAA            .o.                
                HarmRuleIgeu          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeuo         .o.
                HarmRuleIgeoue        .o.
                HarmRuleIgea          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgee          .o.
                HarmRuleIgeo          .o.  
                HarmRuleIgeou         .o.
                HarmRuleIgeoe         .o.
                HarmRuleIgeo2         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeaa         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeija1        .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejatokitek1  .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejakik1      .o. 
                HarmRuleIgetattet     .o.
                HarmRuleeo            .o.
                HarmRulefelteo        .o.
                HarmRulej             .o.
                HarmRuletatt          .o.
                HarmRuleszorelol      .o.
                HarmRuleaen           .o.
                HarmRuleaet           .o.
                HarmRuleoe2           .o.
                HarmRuleae2           .o.
                HarmRulesj            .o.
                HarmRulesj1           .o.
                HarmRuleess           .o.
                HarmRuleAAAmely           .o. 
                HarmRuleAAmely            .o.                
                HarmRuleIgeumely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeuomely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeamely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeemely          .o.
                HarmRuleIgeomely          .o.  
                HarmRuleIgeo2mely         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeaamely         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeija1mely        .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejatokitek1mely  .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejakik1mely      .o. 
                HarmRuleIgetattetmely     .o.
                HarmRuleeomely            .o.
                HarmRulefelteomely        .o.
                HarmRuleszorelolmely      .o.
                HarmRulenook              .o.
                HarmRulenookmely          .o.
                Cleanup                 .o.
                ToUpCase ;         
                                 
echo ">>> read in enhuigeik <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/verb/enhuigeik.lexc
define Lexiconik
